Hawaii statutes.
[PART XIV.]
UNLICENSED CONTRACTING OFFENSES

§708-8300 Unlicensed contracting
activity. (1) A person commits the offense of unlicensed contracting
activity if the person:

(a) Engages in any activity that requires a
contractor's license under chapter 444 and is not a licensed contractor
engaging in the activity, other than a contractor who inadvertently fails to
maintain licensing requirements under chapter 444 and who subsequently corrects
the failure so that there was a lapse of no more than sixty days in licensure; or

(b) Uses any word, title, or representation to
induce the false belief that the person is licensed under chapter 444 to engage
in contracting activity.

(2) Unlicensed contracting activity is a
misdemeanor.

(3) Each day the violation of this section
continues after written notice of the violation to the unlicensed contractor shall
constitute a distinct and separate offense.

(4) It is an affirmative defense to a
prosecution under this section that the defendant was a licensed contractor
performing activity outside the scope of the defendant's contractor's license.
This defense shall not preclude any administrative or civil enforcement action
for the unlicensed activity. [L 2012, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 182, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next